Louisiana, session 2026, HB996.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1505.2(I)(2)(b)(iii) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§1505.2. Contributions; expenditures; certain prohibitions and limitations
* * *
I.
* * *
(2)
* * *
(b) The following expenditures shall be presumed to be made for the
personal use of the candidate or his principal campaign committee or a subsidiary
committee thereof or an elected official or his leadership committee and shall be
prohibited unless the candidate, elected official, or committee overcomes the
presumption by showing by a preponderance of the evidence that the expenditure
was not for personal use:
* * *
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1488 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 996
(iii) Clothing expenses, except for the following:
(aa) Items items of de minimis value that are used in the campaign, such as
campaign shirts or hats, or.
(bb) Specialized specialized apparel necessary to attend a specific
fundraising event or event related to the holding of office.
(cc) For members of the legislature, clothing, including belts and footwear,
required for holding office and expenses for the cleaning and maintenance thereof.
The expenses provided for in this Subitem shall not exceed two thousand five
hundred dollars per calendar year.
* * *